North Carolina, session 2025, SB302.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1.(a) G.S. 135-4.5 is amended by adding a new subsection to read:
"(h) Purchases of Service Credit for Advanced Law Enforcement or Advanced
Corrections Certificates. – Notwithstanding any other provision of this Article to the contrary, a
member in service with five or more years of membership service who has been awarded either
(i) the Advanced Law Enforcement Certificate issued by either the North Carolina Criminal
Justice Education and Training Standards Commission under the authority granted under Chapter
17C of the General Statutes or the North Carolina Sheriffs' Education and Training Standards
Commission under the authority granted under Chapter 17E of the General Statutes or (ii) the
Advanced Corrections Certificate issued by the North Carolina Criminal Justice Education and
Training Standards Commission under the authority granted under Chapter 17C of the General
Statutes may purchase creditable service subject to all of the following:
(1) The member may purchase up to a total of four years of creditable service
under this subsection.
(2) Service may only be purchased under this subsection upon or after receipt of
the applicable certificate.
(3) G.S. 135-4(b) does not apply to purchases under this subsection.
(4) Purchases of service under this subsection shall be made by paying a lump
sum amount to the Annuity Savings Fund. Purchases shall not be associated
with any specific compensation or period of time. The amount payable shall
be equal to the full liability increase of the Retirement System due to the
additional service credits purchased plus an administrative fee that is set by
the Board of Trustees. The full liability increase shall be calculated on the
basis of the same assumptions used for the purposes of the actuarial valuation
of the liabilities of the Retirement System, except for the following
assumptions specific to this calculation: (i) the allowance shall be assumed to
*S302-v-1*

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
commence at the earliest age at which the member could retire on an
unreduced retirement allowance and (ii) there shall be assumed annual
postretirement allowance increases set by the Board of Trustees upon the
advice of the consulting actuary.
(5) An employer may pay all or part of the cost of a purchase of service under this
subsection. To the extent that the purchase is paid by the employer, the amount
paid by the employer shall be credited to the Pension Accumulation Fund. To
the extent that the purchase is paid by the member, the amount paid by the
member shall be credited to the member's accumulated contributions and
interest in the Annuity Savings Fund."
SECTION 1.(b) G.S. 135-4(b) reads as rewritten:
"(b) In Unless specifically provided under G.S. 135-4.5, in no case shall more than one
year of service be creditable for all services in one year. Service rendered for the regular school
year in any district shall be equivalent to one year's service. Service rendered by a school
employee in a job-sharing position shall be credited at the rate of one-half year for each regular
school year of employment."
SECTION 2.(a) G.S. 128-26.5 is amended by adding a new subsection to read:
"(h) Purchases of Service Credit for Advanced Law Enforcement Certificate. –
Notwithstanding any other provision of this Article to the contrary, a member in service with five
or more years of membership service who has been awarded the Advanced Law Enforcement
Certificate issued by either the North Carolina Criminal Justice Education and Training
Standards Commission under the authority granted under Chapter 17C of the General Statutes or
the North Carolina Sheriffs' Education and Training Standards Commission under the authority
granted under Chapter 17E of the General Statutes may purchase creditable service subject to all
of the following:
(1) The member may purchase up to a total of four years of creditable service
under this subsection.
(2) Service may only be purchased under this subsection upon or after receipt of
the applicable certificate.
(3) G.S. 128-26(b) does not apply to purchases under this subsection.
(4) Purchases of service under this subsection shall be made by paying a lump
sum amount to the Annuity Savings Fund. Purchases shall not be associated
with any specific compensation or period of time. The amount payable shall
be equal to the full liability increase of the Retirement System due to the
additional service credits purchased plus an administrative fee that is set by
the Board of Trustees. The full liability increase shall be calculated on the
basis of the same assumptions used for the purposes of the actuarial valuation
of the liabilities of the Retirement System, except for the following
assumptions specific to this calculation: (i) the allowance shall be assumed to
commence at the earliest age at which the member could retire on an
unreduced retirement allowance and (ii) there shall be assumed annual
postretirement allowance increases set by the Board of Trustees upon the
advice of the consulting actuary.
(5) An employer may pay all or part of the cost of a purchase of service under this
subsection. To the extent that the purchase is paid by the employer, the amount
paid by the employer shall be credited to the Pension Accumulation Fund. To
the extent that the purchase is paid by the member, the amount paid by the
member shall be credited to the member's accumulated contributions and
interest in the Annuity Savings Fund."
SECTION 2.(b) G.S. 128-26(b) reads as rewritten:
Page 2 Senate Bill 302-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
"(b) In Unless specifically provided under G.S. 128-26.5, in no case shall more than one
year of service be creditable for all service in one calendar year."
SECTION 3. This act becomes effective July 1, 2025.
Senate Bill 302-First Edition Page 3